North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44A. Statutory Liens and Charges.
Article 2. Statutory Liens on Real Property.

Part 1. Liens of Mechanics, Laborers, and Materialmen Dealing with Owner.

§ 44A-7.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply in this Article:

Contractor. — A person who contracts with an owner to improve real property.

First tier subcontractor. — A person who contracts with a contractor to improve real property.

Improve. — To build, effect, alter, repair, or demolish any improvement upon, connected with, or on or beneath the surface of any real property, or to excavate, clear, grade, fill or landscape any real property, or to construct driveways and private roadways, or to furnish materials, including trees and shrubbery, for any of such purposes, or to perform any labor upon such improvements, and shall also mean and include any design or other professional or skilled services furnished by architects, engineers, land surveyors and landscape architects registered under Chapter 83A, 89A or 89C of the General Statutes, and rental of equipment directly utilized on the real property in making the improvement.

Improvement. — All or any part of any building, structure, erection, alteration, demolition, excavation, clearing, grading, filling, or landscaping, including trees and shrubbery, driveways, and private roadways, on real property.

(4a)

Inspection department. — Any city or county building inspection department authorized by Chapter 160A or Chapter 153A of the General Statutes.

(4b)

Lien agent. — A title insurance company or title insurance agency designated by an owner pursuant to

G.S. 44A-11.1

.

Obligor. — An owner, contractor, or subcontractor in any tier who owes money to another as a result of the other’s partial or total performance of a contract to improve real property.

Owner. — A person who has an interest in the real property improved and for whom an improvement is made and who ordered the improvement to be made. “Owner” includes successors in interest of the owner and agents of the owner acting within their authority.

(6a)

Potential lien claimant. — Any person entitled to claim a lien for improvements to real property under this Article who is subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

.

Real property. — The real estate that is improved, including lands, leaseholds, tenements and hereditaments, and improvements placed thereon.

Second tier subcontractor. — A person who contracts with a first tier subcontractor to improve real property.

Third tier subcontractor. — A person who contracts with a second tier subcontractor to improve real property.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 1975, c. 715, s. 1; 1985, c. 689, s. 13; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 607, s. 1; 2012-158, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-229, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, and applicable to claims of lien on real property filed and notices of claims of lien upon funds served on or after that date, made a minor stylistic change in the part heading.

Session Laws 2012-158, s. 1, effective April 1, 2013, added subdivisions (4a), (4b), and (6a). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 1, effective January 1, 2013, added subdivisions (1), (2), (5), (8) and (9) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “requires, the following definitions apply in this Article” for “requires in this Article” at the end of the introductory paragraph; and made stylistic and punctuation changes throughout the list of definitions. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on civil procedure, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 874 (1978).

For comment on materialmen’s liens in North Carolina, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 926 (1983).

For article, “North Carolina Construction Law Survey II,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 481 (1987).

For note, “Mechanics’ Liens—Judicial Legislation at Work: Changes in the Mechanics’ Lien Law of North Carolina after Electric Supply Co. v. Swain Electrical Co.,” see 27 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1033 (1992).

§ 44A-8.
Mechanics’, laborers’, and materialmen’s lien; persons entitled to claim of lien on real property.

Any person who performs or furnishes labor or professional design or surveying services or furnishes materials or furnishes rental equipment pursuant to a contract, either express or implied, with the owner of real property for the making of an improvement thereon shall, upon complying with the provisions of this Article, have a right to file a claim of lien on real property on the real property to secure payment of all debts owing for labor done or professional design or surveying services or material furnished or equipment rented pursuant to the contract.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 1975, c. 715, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 607, s. 2; 2005-229, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Mechanics’ Liens for the Improvement of Real Property: Recent Developments in Perfection, Enforcement and Priority,” see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 283 (1976).

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

For comment, “Offer to Purchase and Contract: Buyer Beware,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 473 (1986).

For note, “Judicial Activism Constructs Lenders’ Nightmare — Embree Construction Group, Inc. v. Rafcor, Inc. and United Carolina Bank,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 77 (1992).

For article, “North Carolina’s Real Estate Recording Laws: The Ghost of 1885,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 199 (2006).

§ 44A-9.
Extent of claim of lien on real property.

A claim of lien on real property authorized under this Article shall extend to the improvement and to the lot or tract on which the improvement is situated, to the extent of the interest of the owner. When the lot or tract on which a building is erected is not surrounded at the time of making the contract with the owner by an enclosure separating it from adjoining land of the same owner, the lot or tract to which any claim of lien on real property extends shall be the area that is reasonably necessary for the convenient use and occupation of the building, but in no case shall the area include a building, structure, or improvement not normally used or occupied or intended to be used or occupied with the building with respect to which the claim of lien on real property is claimed.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1.

§ 44A-10.
Effective date of claim of lien on real property.

A claim of lien on real property granted by this Article shall relate to and take effect from the time of the first furnishing of labor or materials at the site of the improvement by the person claiming the claim of lien on real property.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

For article, “Future Advances and Title Insurance Coverage,” see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 329 (1979).

§ 44A-11.
Perfecting claim of lien on real property.

Perfection. — A claim of lien on real property granted by this Article shall be perfected as of the time provided in

G.S. 44A-10

upon the occurrence of all of the following:

Service of a copy of the claim of lien on real property upon the record owner of the real property claimed to be subject to the claim of lien and, if the claim of lien on real property is being asserted pursuant to

G.S. 44A-23

, also upon the contractor through which subrogation is being asserted.

Filing of the claim of lien on real property under

G.S. 44A-12

.

Method of Service. — Service of the claim of lien on real property pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not require proof of actual receipt by the listed recipient and shall be complete upon the occurrence of any of the following:

Personal delivery of a copy of the claim of lien on real property upon the recipient.

Deposit of a copy of the claim of lien on real property in a postpaid, properly addressed wrapper in either of the following:

A post office or official depository under the exclusive care and custody of the United States Postal Service.

An authorized depository under the exclusive care and custody of a designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2).

Service Address. — For purposes of this section, a wrapper addressed to a party required to be served under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section shall be conclusively deemed properly addressed if it uses any of the following addresses:

The address for the party to be served listed on the permit issued for the improvement.

The address for the party to be served listed with the tax rolls for any county in North Carolina.

The address of the registered agent for the party to be served listed with the North Carolina Secretary of State’s office.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 2, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Mechanics’ Liens for the Improvement of Real Property: Recent Developments in Perfection, Enforcement and Priority,” see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 283 (1976).

§ 44A-11.1.
Lien agent; designation and duties.

With regard to any improvements to real property to which this Article is applicable for which the costs of the undertaking are thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more, either at the time that the original building permit is issued or, in cases in which no building permit is required, at the time the contract for the improvements is entered into with the owner, the owner shall designate a lien agent no later than the time the owner first contracts with any person to improve the real property. Provided, however, that the owner is not required to designate a lien agent for improvements to an existing single-family residential dwelling unit as defined in G.S. 87-15.5(7) that is occupied by the owner as a residence, or for the addition of an accessory building or accessory structure as defined in the North Carolina Uniform Residential Building Code, the use of which is incidental to that residence. The owner shall deliver written notice of designation to its designated lien agent by any method authorized in

G.S. 44A-11.2

(f), and shall include in its notice the street address, tax map lot and block number, reference to recorded instrument, or any other description that reasonably identifies the real property for the improvements to which the lien agent has been designated, and the owner’s contact information. Designation of a lien agent pursuant to this section does not make the lien agent an agent of the owner for purposes of receiving a Claim of Lien on Real Property, a Notice of Claim of Lien upon Funds, a Notice of Subcontract, or for any purpose other than the receipt of notices to the lien agent required under

G.S. 44A-11.2

.

(a1)

Where the improvements to a real property leasehold are limited to the purchase, transportation, and setup of a manufactured home, as defined in G.S. 143-143.9(6), for which there is a current certificate of title, the purchase price of the manufactured home shall be excluded in determining whether the costs of the undertaking are thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more.

The lien agent shall be chosen from among the list of registered lien agents maintained by the Department of Insurance pursuant to

G.S. 58-26-45

.

Upon receipt of written notification of designation by an owner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the lien agent shall have the duties as set forth in

G.S. 58-26-45(b)

.

In the event that the lien agent resigns, is no longer licensed to serve as a lien agent, revokes its consent to serve as lien agent or is removed by the owner, or otherwise becomes unable or unwilling to serve before the completion of all improvements to the real property, the owner shall within three business days of notice of such event do all of the following:

Designate a successor lien agent and provide written notice of designation to the successor lien agent pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Provide the contact information for the successor lien agent to the inspection department that issued any required building permit and to any persons who requested information from the owner relating to the predecessor lien agent.

Display the contact information for the successor lien agent on the building permit or attachment thereto posted on the improved property or, if no building permit was required, on a sign complying with G.S. 44A-11.2(e).

Until such time as the owner has fully complied with subsection (d) of this section, notice transmitted to the predecessor lien agent shall be deemed effective notice, notwithstanding the fact that the lien agent may have resigned or otherwise become unable or unwilling to serve.

Any attorney who, in connection with a transaction involving improved real property subject to this section for which the attorney is serving as the closing attorney, contacts the lien agent in writing and requests copies of the notices to lien agent, renewals of notices to lien agent, and cancellations of notices to lien agent received by the lien agent relating to the real property not more than five business days prior to the date of recordation of a deed or deed of trust on the real property, shall be deemed to have fulfilled the attorney’s professional obligation as closing attorney to check such notices to lien agent, renewals of notices to lien agent, and cancellations of notices to lien agent and shall have no further duty to request that the lien agent provide information pertaining to notices or cancellations received subsequently by the lien agent.

History.

2012-158, s. 2; 2013-16, s. 1; 2013-117, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 35(a); 2016-59, s. 7; 2017-168, s. 1.

§ 44A-11.2.
Identification of lien agent; notice to lien agent; effect of notice.

As used in this section, the term “contact information” means the name, physical and mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number, and electronic mail address of the lien agent designated by the owner pursuant to

G.S. 44A-11.1

.

Within seven days of receiving a written request by a potential lien claimant by any delivery method specified in subsection (f) of this section, the owner shall provide a notice to the potential lien claimant containing the contact information for the lien agent, by the same delivery method used by the potential lien claimant in making the request.

(b1)

A potential lien claimant making a request pursuant to subsection (b) of this section who did not receive the lien agent contact information pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, and who has not furnished labor, materials, rental equipment, or professional design or surveying services at the site of the improvements, or who last furnished labor, materials, rental equipment, or professional design or surveying services at the site of the improvements prior to the posting of the contact information for the lien agent pursuant to subsection (d) or (e) of this section, has no obligation to give notice to the lien agent under this section until the potential lien claimant has received the contact information from the owner.

A contractor or subcontractor for improvements to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

shall, within three business days of contracting with a lower-tier subcontractor who is not required to furnish labor, materials, rental equipment, or professional design or surveying services at the site of the improvements, provide the lower-tier subcontractor with a written notice containing the contact information for the lien agent designated by the owner. This notice shall be given pursuant to subsection (f) of this section or may be given by including the lien agent contact information in a written subcontract entered into by, or a written purchase order issued to, the lower-tier subcontractor entitled to the notice required by this subsection. Any contractor or subcontractor who has previously received notice of the lien agent contact information, whether from the building permit, the inspections office, a notice from the owner, contractor, or subcontractor, or by any other means, and who fails to provide the lien agent contact information to the lower-tier subcontractor in the time required under this subsection, is liable to the lower-tier subcontractor for any actual damages incurred by the lower-tier subcontractor as a result of the failure to give notice.

For any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, any building permit issued pursuant to G.S. 160A-417(d) or G.S. 153A-357(e) shall be conspicuously and continuously posted on the property for which the permit is issued until the completion of all construction.

For any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, a sign disclosing the contact information for the lien agent shall be conspicuously and continuously posted on the property until the completion of all construction if the contact information for the lien agent is not contained in a building permit or attachment thereto posted on the property.

In complying with any requirement for written notice pursuant to this section, the notice shall be addressed to the person required to be provided with the notice and shall be delivered by any of the following methods:

Certified mail, return receipt requested.

Signature confirmation as provided by the United States Postal Service.

Physical delivery and obtaining a delivery receipt from the lien agent.

Facsimile with a facsimile confirmation.

Depositing with a designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2).

Electronic mail, with delivery receipt.

Utilizing an Internet Web site approved for such use by the designated lien agent to transmit to the designated lien agent, with delivery receipt, all information required to notify the lien agent of its designation pursuant to

G.S. 44A-11.1

or to provide a notice to the designated lien agent pursuant to this section.

As used in this subsection, “delivery receipt” includes an electronic or facsimile confirmation. A return receipt or other receipt showing delivery of the notice to the addressee or written evidence that the notice was delivered by the postal service or other carrier to but not accepted by the addressee is prima facie evidence of receipt.

For purposes of this subsection, “custom contractor” means a contractor duly licensed as a general contractor pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes who has contracted with an owner who is not an affiliate, relative, or insider of the contractor to build a single-family residence on the owner’s property to be occupied by the owner as a residence. A custom contractor shall be deemed to have met the requirement of notice under subsections (l) and (m) of this section on the date of the lien agent’s receipt of notice of its designation as lien agent delivered to it by the custom contractor in accordance with this section if, at the time of the lien agent’s receipt of the notice, all of the following conditions are met:

The owner has not previously designated a lien agent for the improvements to which the notice of designation of lien agent relates.

The custom contractor is authorized to designate the lien agent on behalf of the owner under the written contract between the owner and custom contractor.

In addition to the information required to be included pursuant to G.S. 44A-11.1(a), the notice of designation of lien agent contains the following information:

The custom contractor’s name, mailing address, telephone number, fax number (if available), and electronic mailing address (if available).

The name of the owner with whom the custom contractor has contracted to improve the real property identified in the notice.After receiving a notice of its designation from a custom contractor pursuant to this subsection, the designated lien agent shall include the custom contractor’s name and contact information in responding to any request for information pursuant to G.S. 58-26-45(b)(7).

When a lien agent is not identified in a contract for improvements to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

entered into between an owner and a design professional, the design professional shall be deemed to have met the requirement of notice under subsections (l) and (m) of this section on the date of the lien agent’s receipt of the owner’s designation of the lien agent. The owner shall provide written notice to the lien agent containing the information pertaining to the design professional required in a notice to lien agent pursuant to subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (i) of this section, by any method of delivery authorized in subsection (f) of this section. The lien agent shall include the design professional’s name and address in its response to any persons requesting information relating to persons who have given notice to the lien agent pursuant to this section. For purposes of this subsection, the term “design professional” means any architects, engineers, land surveyors, and landscape architects registered under Chapter 83A, 89A, or 89C of the General Statutes.

The form of the notice to be given under this section shall be legible, shall include the following information unless designated as “if available,” and shall be substantially as follows:

Click to view

The service of the Notice to Lien Agent does not satisfy the service or filing requirements applicable to a Notice of Subcontract under Part 2 of Article 2 of this Chapter, a Notice of Claim of Lien upon Funds under Part 2 of Article 2 of this Chapter, or a Claim of Lien on Real Property under Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 2 of this Chapter. A Notice to Lien Agent shall not be combined with or make reference to a Notice of Subcontract or Notice of Claim of Lien upon Funds as described in this subsection.

The notice to lien agent shall not be filed with the clerk of superior court. An inaccuracy in the description of the improved real property provided in the notice does not bar a person from claiming a lien under this Article or otherwise perfecting or enforcing a claim of lien as provided in this Article, if the improved real property can otherwise reasonably be identified from the information contained in the notice.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, for any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, a potential lien claimant may perfect a claim of lien on real property only if at least one of the following conditions is met:

The lien agent identified in accordance with this section has received a Notice to Lien Agent from the potential lien claimant no later than 15 days after the first furnishing of labor or materials by the potential lien claimant.

Any of the following conditions is met:

The lien agent identified in accordance with this section has received a Notice to Lien Agent from the potential lien claimant prior to the date of recordation of a conveyance of the property interest in the real property to a bona fide purchaser for value protected under

G.S. 47-18

who is not an affiliate, relative, or insider of the owner.

The potential lien claimant has perfected its claim of lien on real property pursuant to

G.S. 44A-11

prior to the recordation of a conveyance of the property interest in the real property to a bona fide purchaser for value protected under

G.S. 47-18

who is not an affiliate, relative, or insider of the owner.

As used in this subdivision, the terms “affiliate,” “relative,” and “insider” have the meanings as set forth in

G.S. 39-23.1

.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, for any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, the claim of lien on real property of a potential lien claimant that is not perfected pursuant to

G.S. 44A-11

prior to the recordation of any mortgage or deed of trust for the benefit of one who is not an affiliate, relative, or insider of the owner is subordinate to the previously recorded mortgage or deed of trust unless at least one of the following conditions is met:

The lien agent identified in accordance with this section has received a Notice to Lien Agent from the potential lien claimant no later than 15 days after the first furnishing of labor or materials by the potential lien claimant.

The lien agent identified in accordance with this section has received a Notice to Lien Agent from the potential lien claimant prior to the date of recordation of the mortgage or deed of trust.

For any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, a potential lien claimant is not required to comply with this section if the lien agent contact information is neither contained in the building permit or attachment thereto or sign posted on the improved property pursuant to subsection (d) or (e) of this section at the time when the potential lien claimant was furnishing labor, materials, rental equipment, or professional design or surveying services at the site of the improvements, nor timely provided by the owner in response to a written request by the potential lien claimant made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The lien rights of a potential lien claimant who is given erroneous information by the owner regarding the identity of the lien agent are not extinguished under subsection (l) of this section nor subordinated under subsection (m) of this section.

Except as provided in subsections (l) and (m) of this section, nothing contained in this section affects a claim of lien upon funds pursuant to

G.S. 44A-18

.

A potential lien claimant may provide the notice to lien agent required under this section regardless of whether the improvements for which the potential lien claimant is responsible are contracted, started, in process, or completed at the time of submitting the notice.

For any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

, a potential lien claimant may cancel a Notice to Lien Agent by utilizing the Internet Web site approved for such use by the designated lien agent. For any improvement to real property subject to

G.S. 44A-11.1

comprising one- or two-family dwellings, a potential lien claimant shall cancel a Notice to Lien Agent by utilizing the Internet Web site approved for such use by the designated lien agent within a reasonable time after the potential lien claimant has confirmed its receipt of final payment for the improvement to which the Notice to Lien Agent relates.

A Notice to Lien Agent not otherwise cancelled or renewed pursuant to this section expires and is discharged five years from its date of delivery to the lien agent.

A Notice to Lien Agent may be renewed prior to its cancellation or automatic expiration for one five-year period by utilizing the Internet Web site approved for such use by the designated lien agent. Such renewal shall extend the date of expiration by five years.

If a Notice to Lien Agent is timely renewed prior to cancellation or expiration pursuant to this section, the renewal shall maintain and relate back to the original delivery date of the Notice to Lien Agent.

Any protections provided to a potential lien claimant under this section as the result of its delivery of a Notice to Lien Agent shall terminate upon the cancellation or automatic expiration of that Notice to Lien Agent pursuant to this section and shall not thereafter be revived or renewed by subsequent delivery of a Notice to Lien Agent by that potential lien claimant.

Cancellation or expiration of a Notice to Lien Agent pursuant to this section has no effect upon the validity of a previously filed claim of lien or upon the priority of lien rights.

NOTICE TO LIEN AGENT (1) Potential lien claimant’s name, mailing address, telephone number, fax number (if available), and electronic mailing address (if available): (2) Name of the party with whom the potential lien claimant has contracted to improve the real property described below: (3) A description of the real property sufficient to identify the real property, such as the name of the project, if applicable, the physical address as shown on the building permit or notice received from the owner: (4) I give notice of my right subsequently to pursue a claim of lien for improvements to the real property described in this notice. Dated: Potential Lien Claimant

History.

2012-158, s. 2; 2013-16, s. 2; 2013-117, s. 2; 2014-115, s. 35(b); 2017-168, s. 2; 2018-142, s. 8(a).

§ 44A-12.
Filing claim of lien on real property.

Place of Filing. — All claims of lien on real property must be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court in each county where the real property subject to the claim of lien on real property is located. The clerk of superior court shall note the claim of lien on real property on the judgment docket and index the same under the name of the record owner of the real property at the time the claim of lien on real property is filed. An additional copy of the claim of lien on real property may also be filed with any receiver, referee in bankruptcy or assignee for benefit of creditors who obtains legal authority over the real property.

Time of Filing. — Claims of lien on real property may be filed at any time after the maturity of the obligation secured thereby but not later than 120 days after the last furnishing of labor or materials at the site of the improvement by the person claiming the lien.

Contents of Claim of Lien on Real Property to Be Filed. — All claims of lien on real property must be filed using a form substantially as follows:

CLAIM OF LIEN ON REAL PROPERTY

Name and address of the person claiming the claim of lien on real property:

Name and address of the record owner of the real property claimed to be subject to the claim of lien on real property at the time the claim of lien on real property is filed and, if the claim of lien on real property is being asserted pursuant to

G.S. 44A-23

, the name of the contractor through which subrogation is being asserted:

Description of the real property upon which the claim of lien on real property is claimed: (Street address, tax lot and block number, reference to recorded instrument, or any other description of real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.)

Name and address of the person with whom the claimant contracted for the furnishing of labor or materials:

Date upon which labor or materials were first furnished upon said property by the claimant:

(5a)

Date upon which labor or materials were last furnished upon said property by the claimant:

General description of the labor performed or materials furnished and the amount claimed therefor:

_________

Lien Claimant

Filed this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________

_________

Clerk of Superior Court I hereby certify that I have served the parties listed in (2) above in accordance with the requirements of

G.S. 44A-11

.A general description of the labor performed or materials furnished is sufficient. It is not necessary for lien claimant to file an itemized list of materials or a detailed statement of labor performed.

No Amendment of Claim of Lien on Real Property. — A claim of lien on real property may not be amended. A claim of lien on real property may be cancelled by a claimant or the claimant’s authorized agent or attorney and a new claim of lien on real property substituted therefor within the time herein provided for original filing.

Notice of Assignment of Claim of Lien on Real Property. — When a claim of lien on real property has been filed, it may be assigned of record by the lien claimant in a writing filed with the clerk of superior court who shall note the assignment in the margin of the judgment docket containing the claim of lien on real property. Thereafter the assignee becomes the lien claimant of record.

Waiver of Right to File, Serve, or Claim Liens as Consideration for Contract Against Public Policy. — An agreement to waive the right to file a claim of lien on real property granted under this Part, or an agreement to waive the right to serve a notice of claim of lien upon funds granted under Part 2 of this Article, which agreement is in anticipation of and in consideration for the awarding of any contract, either expressed or implied, for the making of an improvement upon real property under this Article is against public policy and is unenforceable. This section does not prohibit subordination or release of a lien granted under this Part or Part 2 of this Article.

History.

1969, c. 1112, s. 1; 1977, c. 369; 1983, c. 888; 1999-456, s. 59; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-175, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to filing a false lien or encumbrance, see

G.S. 14-118.6

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-175, s. 3, effective January 1, 2013, in the form in subsection (c), added “and, if the claim of lien on real property is being asserted pursuant to

G.S. 44A-23

, the name of the contractor through which subrogation is being asserted” at the end of item (2) and added the last paragraph. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Transferring North Carolina Real Estate Part I: How the Present System Functions,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 418 (1971).

For comment, “Offer to Purchase and Contract: Buyer Beware,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 473 (1986).

For article, “North Carolina’s Real Estate Recording Laws: The Ghost of 1885,” see
28 N.C. Cent. L.J. 199 (2006).

§ 44A-12.1.
No docketing of lien unless authorized by statute.

The clerk of superior court shall not index, docket, or record a claim of lien on real property or other document purporting to claim or assert a lien on real property in such a way as to affect the title to any real property unless the document:

Is offered for filing under this Article or another statute that provides for indexing and docketing of claims of lien on real property; and

Appears on its face to contain all of the information required by the statute under which it is offered for filing.

The clerk may accept, for filing only, any document that does not meet the criteria established for indexing, docketing, or recording under subsection (a) of this section. If the clerk does accept this document, the clerk shall inform the person offering the document that it will not be indexed, docketed, or recorded in any way as to affect the title to any real property.

Any person who causes or attempts to cause a claim of lien on real property or other document to be filed, knowing that the filing is not authorized by statute, or with the intent that the filing is made for an improper purpose such as to hinder, harass, or otherwise wrongfully interfere with any person, shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

A claim of lien on real property, a claim of lien on real property with a notice of claim of lien upon funds attached thereto, or other document purporting to claim or assert a lien on real property that is filed by an attorney licensed in the State of North Carolina and that otherwise complies with subsection (a) of this section shall not be rejected by the clerk of superior court for indexing, docketing, recording, or filing.

History.

2001-495, s. 1; 2005-229, s. 1; 2012-150, s. 6.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-150, s. 6.1, substituted “Class I felony” for “Class 1 misdemeanor” at the end of subsection (c). For applicability, see editor’s note.